Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
394B

DISLOCATED
WORKERS

Section

394B-1 Findings and purpose

394B-2 Definitions

394B-3 Employment opportunities

394B-4 Dislocated workers program

394B-5 Relocation assistance

394B-6 Training costs to employers

394B-7 Labor organization consultation

394B-8 Coordination with federal programs

394B-9 Notification; penalty

394B-10 Dislocated worker allowance

394B-11 Prompt payment of wages and benefits

394B-12 Civil penalties

394B-13 Employees remedies

Note

State additional benefits for unemployed workers in Maui
county (repealed October 28, 2017). L 2016, c 70.

Law Journals and Reviews

Employee Rights Under Judicial Scrutiny: Prevalent Policy
Discourse and the Hawai‘i Supreme Court. 14 UH L. Rev. 189 (1992).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next